Vermont, session 2025-2026, H334.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 495q is added to read:
§ 495q. AGREEMENTS NOT TO COMPETE; PROHIBITION;
EXCEPTIONS; NOTICE; EMPLOYEE RIGHTS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Agreement not to compete” means an agreement between an
employer and an employee that restricts the employee, after separating from
employment, from performing:
(i) work for another employer for a specified period of time;
(ii) work in a specified geographical area; or
(iii) work for another employer in a capacity similar to the
employee’s work for the employee’s former employer that is party to the
agreement.
(B) An agreement not to compete does not include:
(i) an agreement that prohibits the disclosure of trade secrets as
defined in 9 V.S.A. § 4601 or a nondisclosure agreement that protects
confidential business information that does not constitute a trade secret; or
(ii) a nonsolicitation agreement between an employer and an
employee, provided that the limitations set forth in the agreement are
reasonable in time, geographical area, and the scope of activity to be
restrained.
VT LEG #380217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.334
2025 Page 3 of 6
(2) “Nonsolicitation agreement” means an agreement between an
employer and employee pursuant to which the employee agrees not to:
(A) solicit or recruit the employer’s employees; or
(B) solicit or transact business with customers or clients of the
employer who were customers or clients while the employee was employed by
the employer.
(b) Prohibition. Any agreement not to compete, including an agreement
not to compete contained within a contract, is void and unenforceable.
(c) Exceptions. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an
individual from entering into an agreement not to compete in relation to:
(1) the sale of all or substantially all of the individual’s ownership
interest in:
(A) a business or its operating assets; or
(B) a subsidiary or division of a business or the operating assets of a
subsidiary or division of a business;
(2) the dissolution of a partnership in which the individual is a partner or
the dissociation of the individual from a partnership; or
(3) the dissolution of a limited liability company in which the individual
is a member or the termination of an individual’s interest in a limited liability
company.
VT LEG #380217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.334
2025 Page 4 of 6
(d) Notice. For existing agreements not to compete that violate subsection
(b) of this section, the employer must notify each employee who is party to the
agreement that the agreement not to compete is void and legally unenforceable.
Notice shall be in the form of a written individualized communication
addressed to the employee or former employee and shall be delivered to the
last known address and email address of the employee or former employee.
(e) Employee rights. The provisions against retaliation in subdivision
495(a)(8) of this title and the penalty and enforcement provisions of section
495b of this title shall apply to this section.
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 495r is added to read:
§ 495r. STAY-OR-PAY PROVISIONS; RESTRICTIONS; EXCEPTIONS;
NOTICE; EMPLOYEE RIGHTS
(a) As used in this section, “stay-or-pay provision” means an agreement
between an employer and an employee that requires the employee to pay the
employer upon the employee’s separation from employment. Stay-or-pay
provisions take a variety of forms, including training repayment provisions,
educational repayment contracts, quit fees, damages clauses, sign-on bonuses
or other types of cash payments tied to a mandatory stay period, and other
VT LEG #380217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.334
2025 Page 5 of 6
contracts under which an employee must pay an employer in the event that the
employee voluntarily or involuntarily separates from employment.
(b) It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an employer to require
an employee to pay the employer, pursuant to a stay-or-pay provision,
following an employee’s separation from employment.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, a stay-or-pay provision
shall not be an unlawful employment practice if:
(1) the employee voluntarily agrees to the provision in exchange for a
benefit;
(2) the repayment amount is reasonable and does not exceed the cost to
the employer of the benefit received by the employee;
(3) the repayment amount is specific and provided to the employee
before the employee agrees to the provision;
(4) the length of the stay period associated with the provision is
reasonable based upon a number of factors, including:
(A) the cost of the benefit bestowed;
(B) the value of the benefit to the employee; and
(C) whether the repayment amount decreases over the course of the
stay period; and
(5) the provision does not require repayment if the employee is
terminated without cause.
VT LEG #380217 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.334
2025 Page 6 of 6
(d) For existing stay-or-pay provisions that violate subsection (b) of this
section, the employer must notify each employee who is subject to the
provision that it is void and legally unenforceable. Notice shall be in the form
of a written individualized communication addressed to the employee or
former employee and shall be delivered to the last known address and email
address of the employee or former employee.
(e) An employer shall not retaliate against an employee who exercises or
attempts to exercise the rights provided under this section, including opting not
to enter into a stay-or-pay provision. The provisions against retaliation in
subdivision 495(a)(8) of this title and the penalty and enforcement provisions
of section 495b of this title shall apply to this section.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380217 v.1